Utah statutes.
57-1-11.   Claimant out of possession may convey.

Any person claiming title to any real estate may, notwithstanding there may be an adverse possession thereof, sell and convey his interest therein in the same manner and with the same effect as if he were in the actual possession thereof.



No Change Since 1953

